Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,127
Authorized agency; insurance company; information; confidentiality; testimony.

(1) Any authorized agency or insurance company which receives any information, furnished pursuant to sections 81-5,115 to 81-5,131, shall hold the information in confidence until such time as its release is required pursuant to a criminal or civil proceeding.

(2) Any authorized agency or its personnel may be required to testify in any litigation in which the insurance company at interest is named as a party.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 13.